Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 1 Soil Conservation Generally

Law reviews.

For note, “Land Use Decisions and the Property Tax,” see 11 Ga. St. B. J. 103 (1974).

For article, “Selected Oddities in Georgia Municipal Law,” see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 783 (1975).

2-6-1.
Short title.

This article may be known and cited as the “Georgia Agricultural Conservation and Adjustment Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 538, § 1.

2-6-2.
Purpose of article; legislative findings; acceptance of federal Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act.

It is recognized and declared:

That the soil resources and fertility of the land of this state and the economic use thereof, the prosperity of the farming population of this state, the navigability of the rivers and harbors of this state, and the prevention of floods in this state are matters affected with a public interest;

That the welfare of this state has been impaired and is in danger of being further impaired by destruction of its soil fertility, by uneconomic use and waste of its land, by exploitation and wasteful and unscientific use of its soil resources, by floods and impairment of its rivers and harbors and of the navigability of its waters and water courses as a result of soil erosion, and by the decrease in the purchasing power of the net income per person on farms in the state as compared with the net income per person in the state not on farms;

That such evils have been augmented and are likely to be augmented by similar conditions in other states and are so interrelated with such conditions in other states that the remedying of such conditions in this state requires action by this state in cooperation with the governments and agencies of other states and of the United States and requires assistance therein by the government and agencies of the United States; and

That the formulation and effectuation by this state of state plans in conformity with Section 7 of the federal Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act is calculated to remedy such conditions and will tend to advance the public welfare of this state.

Therefore, in order to promote the welfare of the people of this state by aiding in the preservation and improvement of soil fertility, in the promotion of the economic use and conservation of land, in the diminution of exploitation and wasteful and unscientific use of soil resources, in the protection of rivers and harbors against the results of soil erosion, and in the reestablishment, at as rapid a rate as is practicable and in the general public interest, of the ratio between the purchasing power of the net income per person on farms and that of the net income per person not on farms that prevailed during the five-year period beginning August, 1909, and ending July, 1914, as determined from statistics available in the United States Department of Agriculture, and the maintenance of such ratio, this state assents to and accepts the federal Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act and adopts the policy and purpose of cooperating with the government and agencies of other states and of the United States in the accomplishment of the policy and purposes specified in Section 7 of such act, subject, however, to the following limitations:

The powers conferred in this article shall be used to assist voluntary action calculated to effectuate such purposes;

Such powers shall not be used to discourage the production of supplies of foods and fibers in this state which are sufficient, when taken together with the production thereof in other states of the United States, to maintain normal domestic human consumption, as determined by the secretary of agriculture of the United States from the records of consumption in the years 1920 to 1929, inclusive, taking into consideration increased population, quantities of any commodities that were forced into domestic consumption by a decline in exports of particular commodities, and the quantities of substitutes available for domestic consumption within any general class of food commodities; and

In carrying out the purposes specified in this Code section, due regard shall be given to the maintenance of a continuous and stable national supply of agricultural commodities, adequate to meet consumer demand at prices fair to both producers and consumers.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 538, § 2.

U.S. Code.

The federal Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified principally at

16 U.S.C. § 590

a et seq. Section 7 of the Act is codified at

16 U.S.C. § 590

g.

2-6-3.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Other states of the United States” includes Puerto Rico.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, partnership, firm, business trust, joint-stock company, association, syndicate, group, pool, joint venture, and any other unincorporated association or group.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 538, § 3.

2-6-4.
Designation of state agency.

The Cooperative Extension Service of the University of Georgia, hereinafter called the Cooperative Extension Service, is designated and authorized as the agency of this state to carry out the policy and purposes of this article and to formulate and administer state plans pursuant to the terms of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 538, § 4.

2-6-5.
Formulation and administration of state plans; investigations.

The Cooperative Extension Service is authorized and directed to formulate for each calendar year and to submit to the secretary of agriculture of the United States for and in the name of this state, a state plan for carrying out the purposes of this article during such calendar year.

The Cooperative Extension Service is authorized to modify or revise any such plan in whatever manner, consistent with the terms of this article, it finds necessary to provide for the more substantial accomplishment of the purposes of this article.

Each such plan shall provide for such participation in its administration by such voluntary county and community committees or associations of agricultural producers, organized for such purposes, as the Cooperative Extension Service determines to be necessary or proper for the effective administration of the plan.

Each such plan shall provide, through agreements with agricultural producers or through other voluntary methods:

For such adjustments in the utilization of land, in farming practices, and in the acreage or in the production for market, or both, of agricultural commodities as the Cooperative Extension Service determines to be calculated to effectuate as substantial an accomplishment of the purposes of this article as may reasonably be achieved through action of this state; and

For payments to agricultural producers, in connection with such agreements or methods, in such amounts as the Cooperative Extension Service determines to be fair, reasonable, and calculated to promote such accomplishment of the purposes of this article without depriving such producers of a voluntary and uncoerced choice of action.

Any such plan shall provide for such educational programs as the Cooperative Extension Service determines to be necessary or proper to promote the more substantial accomplishment of the purposes of this article.

Each such plan shall contain an estimate of expenditures necessary to carry out such plan, together with a statement of such amount as the Cooperative Extension Service determines to be necessary to be paid by the secretary of agriculture of the United States as a grant in aid of such plan under Section 7 of the federal Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act, in order to provide for the effective carrying out of such plan and shall designate the amount and due date of each installment of such grant, the period to which such installment relates, and the amount determined by the Cooperative Extension Service to be necessary for carrying out such plan during such period.

The Cooperative Extension Service shall provide for such investigations as it finds to be necessary for the formulation and administration of such plans.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 538, § 5.

Cross references.

Employment and payment of county agricultural and home demonstration agents, §

20-2-62

.

U.S. Code.

Section 7 of the federal Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

16 U.S.C. § 590

g.

2-6-6.
Receipt and disbursement of funds; accounts; auditing; bonds.

The Cooperative Extension Service is authorized to receive, on behalf of this state, all grants of money or other aid made available from any source to assist the state in carrying out the policy and purposes of this article. All such moneys or other aid, together with any moneys appropriated or other provision made by this state for such purpose, shall be forthwith available to the Cooperative Extension Service as the agency of the state, subject, in the case of any funds or other aid received upon conditions, to the conditions upon which such funds or other aid have been received, for the purpose of administering this article. Such moneys or aid may be expended by the Cooperative Extension Service in carrying out the state plans provided for in Code Section 2-6-5 or in otherwise effectuating the purposes and policies of this article.

Subject to any conditions upon which any such money or other aid is made available to the state and subject to the terms of any applicable plan made effective pursuant to this article, such expenditures may include, but need not be limited to, expenditures for:

Administration expenses;

Equipment;

Cost of research and investigation;

Cost of educational activities;

Compensation and expenses of members of the state advisory board provided for in Code Section 2-6-10;

Reimbursement to other state agencies or to voluntary committees or associations of agricultural producers for the costs to such agencies, committees, or associations of assisting in the administration of this article when assistance is requested in writing by the Cooperative Extension Service and rendered to the Cooperative Extension Service;

Reimbursement of any other fund from which the Cooperative Extension Service has made expenditures in providing services in the administration of this article;

Payments to agricultural producers provided for in any plan made effective pursuant to this article;

Salaries of employees; and

All other expenditures requisite to carrying out the provisions and purposes of this article.

The Cooperative Extension Service shall provide for the keeping of full and accurate accounts as such state agency, showing all receipts and expenditures of moneys, securities, or other property received, held, or expended under this article, and shall provide for the auditing of all such accounts and for the execution of surety bonds for all employees entrusted with moneys or securities under this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 538, § 6.

2-6-7.
Assistance of other agencies and associations; rules and regulations; lease or purchase of equipment, facilities, and supplies; employment of personnel.

The Cooperative Extension Service shall utilize such available services and assistance of other state agencies and of voluntary county and community committees and associations of agricultural producers as it determines to be necessary or calculated to assist substantially in the effective administration of this article.

The Cooperative Extension Service shall have the authority to make such rules and regulations consistent with this article and to do any and all other acts consistent with this article which it finds to be necessary or proper for the effective administration of this article.

The Cooperative Extension Service shall have the power and authority to obtain, by lease or purchase, such equipment, office accommodations, facilities, services, and supplies and to employ and determine the qualifications, duties, and compensation of such technical or legal experts or assistants and such other employees, including clerical and stenographic help, as it determines to be necessary or proper to carry out this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 538, § 7.

2-6-8.
Reports; investigations.

The Cooperative Extension Service shall compile or require to be made such reports as it determines to be necessary or proper in order to ascertain whether any plans provided for in this article are being carried out according to their terms. The Cooperative Extension Service shall provide for compliance with such requirements on the part of all persons and agencies participating in the administration of any such plan and may make or cause to be made such investigations as it determines to be necessary or proper to assure the correctness of such reports and to make possible the verification of the reports.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 538, § 10.

2-6-9.
Community associations; community and county committees.

The Cooperative Extension Service, by regulation, shall provide for the organization within each community of a voluntary association in which all agricultural producers who are citizens of this state and residents in such community shall be entitled to equal participation; for the selection by each such association of a community committee, which shall be composed of three members of such association; and for a chairman to be chosen for each such community committee. The Cooperative Extension Service shall also provide for the selection by the members of such community committees within each county of a county committee for such county, to be composed of three members of such community committees, and for the selection of a chairman of each such county committee.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 538, § 8.

2-6-10.
State advisory board.

The Cooperative Extension Service shall, by regulation, provide for the selection of five persons of legal age, resident in this state, to act as farmer members of a state advisory board. Such members shall be selected from the standpoint of their actual farming experience and comprehensive understanding of the agricultural problems of this state and shall represent, as nearly as possible, all sections of the state and all major types of farming.

The state advisory board, upon the request of the Cooperative Extension Service, shall advise the Cooperative Extension Service with regard to all matters of major importance in carrying out this article and may, in the absence of such request, submit advice and information to the Cooperative Extension Service with respect to the administration of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 538, § 9.